Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.22, is amended to read: 43A.22 BENEFITS; INTENT. (a) It is the intent of the state to provide eligible employees and other eligible persons with life insurance and hospital, medical, and dental benefits coverage through provider organizations, hereafter referred to as "carriers," authorized to do business in the state. (b) The commissioner may self-insure any hospital and medical plan offered under sections 43A.22 to 43A.31 to promote reasonably stable and predictable premiums for hospital and medical benefits paid by the state and its employees and to promote affordable, ongoing relationships between employees and dependents and their medical providers. The commissioner shall consult with the commissioners of commerce and health and human services regarding the development and reporting of quality of care measures. new text begin (c) A hospital or medical plan offered under sections 43A.22 to 43A.31 must not cover abortions or abortion-related services, including preabortion services and follow-up services. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62Q.524, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. deleted text begin Exclusiondeleted text end new text begin Exclusionsnew text end . This section does not apply to new text begin the following:new text end new text begin (1) new text end managed care organizations or county-based purchasing plans when the plan provides coverage to public health care program enrollees under chapter 256B or 256Ldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) the State Employees Group Insurance Program under sections 43A.22 to 43A.31; and new text end new text begin (3) any health plan that is not a large group health plan. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62Q.524, subdivisions 4 and 5, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin (b) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 16, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06425 62Q.524 COVERAGE OF ABORTIONS AND ABORTION-RELATED SERVICES. Subd. 4. Reimbursement. (a) The commissioner of commerce must reimburse health plan companies for coverage under this section. Reimbursement is available only for coverage that would not have been provided by the health plan without the requirements of this section. Treatments and services covered by the health plan as of January 1, 2024, are ineligible for payment under this subdivision by the commissioner of commerce. (b) Health plan companies must report to the commissioner of commerce quantified costs attributable to the additional benefit under this section in a format developed by the commissioner. A health plan's coverage as of January 1, 2024, must be used by the health plan company as the basis for determining whether coverage would not have been provided by the health plan for purposes of this subdivision. (c) The commissioner of commerce must evaluate submissions and make payments to health plan companies as provided in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 155.170. Subd. 5. Appropriation. Each fiscal year, an amount necessary to make payments to health plan companies to defray the cost of providing coverage under this section is appropriated to the commissioner of commerce. 256B.0625 COVERED SERVICES. Subd. 16. Abortion services. Medical assistance covers abortions and abortion-related services, including preabortion services and follow-up services.